Arkansas, session 2025, SB374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-51-301(b)(3), concerning the rules and
regulations governing examinations for fire departments and police
departments, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) Public advertisement of all examinations by publication of
notice in some newspaper having a bona fide circulation in the city and by
posting of notice at the city hall at least ten (10) days before the date of
the examinations.
(B)(i) The examinations may be held on the first Monday in April or
the first Monday in October, or both, and more often if necessary under such
rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the board shall be held as
needed by the chief of the fire department or police department who shall
determine the:
(a) Time of the exams;
(b) Date of the exams; and
(c) Frequency of the exams.
(ii) The commission shall have only an indirect role
in an examination under subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i) of this section, which
excludes the commission from:
*SSS094*
04-03-2025 10:49:13 SSS094

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB374
(a) Engaging in interviews; or
(b) Proctoring exams.
(iii) The commission may observe an examination
under subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i) of this section so long as the commission does
not interfere with the examination schedule set by the chief of the fire
department or police department;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-51-301(b)(4)(A)(i)(b), concerning the
rules and regulations related to the creation of an eligibles list for fire
departments and police departments, is amended to read as follows:
(b) If the board creates an eligibles list on
an as-needed basis and a vacancy is created as a result of death,
termination, resignation, demotion, retirement, or promotion, the chief of
the fire department or police department shall notify the board commission
within five (5) business days, and the board shall schedule of the scheduling
of an examination to establish an eligibles list from which an appointment or
promotion shall be made unless the position is determined to be eliminated or
not funded by the governing body of the city.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-51-301(b)(7)(A), concerning the rules
and regulations governing fire departments and police departments, is amended
to read as follows:
(7)(A) A period of probation not to exceed eighteen (18) months
for potential fire department appointees and at least one (1) year but no
longer than two (2) years for potential law enforcement appointees before any
appointment is complete and six (6) twelve (12) months before any promotion
is complete.

/s/B. Davis







04-03-2025 10:49:13 SSS094